California statutes. Elections Code
Any proposal to enact, amend, or otherwise revise a county charter by initiative petition may be submitted to the board of supervisors and shall be subject to this article. However, nothing in this article shall be construed to allow a board of supervisors to enact, amend, or otherwise revise a county charter without submitting the proposal to the voters.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

9103.

(a) Before circulating any initiative petition in a county, or any petition relating to the annexation of territory by a county, the consolidation of counties, or the dissolution of a county, its proponents shall file with the county elections official a notice of intention to do so. The notice shall include the names and business or residence addresses of at least one but not more than five proponents of the petition, and shall be accompanied by the written text of the initiative and a request that a ballot title and summary be prepared.

(b) Any person filing a notice of intent with the county elections official shall pay a fee to be established by the board of supervisors not to exceed two hundred dollars ($200) to be refunded to the filer if, within one year of the date of filing the notice of intent, the county elections official certifies the sufficiency of the petition.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

9103.5.

From the time materials pertaining to an initiative petition are filed pursuant to Section 9103 until the day after the county elections official determines that the initiative petition does not contain the minimum number of signatures required, the day after the election at which the initiative measure is put before the voters, or the day after the proposed ordinance is adopted by the board of supervisors after being submitted to the board of supervisors pursuant to Section 9101, as applicable, the county elections official shall do both of the following:

(a) Keep on file at his or her office the notice of intention, written text of the initiative, and request for a ballot title and summary that the proponents of the
 initiative measure filed with the county elections official pursuant to Section 9103.

(b) Furnish copies of the materials he or she is required to keep on file pursuant to subdivision (a) to any person upon request. The county elections official may charge a fee to a person obtaining copies pursuant to this subdivision. The fee may not exceed the actual cost incurred by the county elections official in providing the copies.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 240, Sec. 1.   (AB 1851)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

9104.

The notice of intention shall contain the printed name, signature, and business or residence address of at least one but not more than five proponents, and may include a printed statement, not exceeding 500 words in length, stating the reasons for the proposed petition. The notice shall be in substantially the following form:
 
Notice of Intention to Circulate Petition

Notice is hereby given by the persons whose names appear hereon of their intention to circulate the petition within the County of ____ for the purpose of ____. A statement of the reasons of the proposed action as contemplated in the petition is as follows: (optional statement).

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

9105.

(a) The county elections official shall immediately transmit a copy of any proposed measure to the county counsel. Within 15 days after the proposed measure is filed, the county counsel shall provide and return to the county elections official a ballot title and summary for the proposed measure. The ballot title may differ from any other title of the proposed measure and shall express in 500 words or less the purpose of the proposed measure. In providing the ballot title, the county counsel shall give a true and impartial statement of the purpose of the proposed measure in such language that the ballot title shall neither be an argument, nor be likely to create prejudice, for or against the proposed measure.

(b) The county elections official shall furnish a copy of the ballot title and summary to the proponents of the proposed measure. The proponents shall, prior to the circulation of the petition, publish the Notice of Intention, and the ballot title and summary of the proposed measure in a newspaper of general circulation published in that county, and file proof of publication with the county elections official.

(c) The ballot title and summary prepared by the county counsel shall appear upon each section of the petition, above the text of the proposed measure and across the top of each page of the petition on which signatures are to appear, in roman type not smaller than 11 point. The ballot title and summary shall be clearly separated from the text of the measure. The text of the
 measure shall be printed in type not smaller than 8 point. The heading of the proposed measure shall be in a boldface type in substantially the following form:

INITIATIVE MEASURE TO BE DIRECTLY SUBMITTED TO THE VOTERS

The county counsel has prepared the following title and summary of the chief purpose and points of the proposed measure:

(Here set forth the title and summary prepared by the county counsel. This title and summary must also be printed across the top of each page of the petition whereon signatures are to appear.)

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 887, Sec. 6.   (SB 1360)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

9106.

Any elector of the county may seek a writ of mandate requiring the ballot title or summary prepared by the county counsel to be amended. The court shall expedite hearing on the writ. A peremptory writ of mandate shall be issued only upon clear and convincing proof that the ballot title or summary is false, misleading, or inconsistent with the requirements of Section 9105.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 237, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

9107.

The county elections official shall ascertain the number of signatures required to sign the petition by obtaining the number of votes cast within the county for all candidates for Governor at the last gubernatorial election preceding the publication of the notice of intention to circulate the initiative petition.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

9108.

The proponents may commence to circulate the petitions among the voters of the county for signatures by any registered voter of the county after publication of the title and summary prepared by the county counsel. Each section of the petition shall bear a copy of the notice of intention, and the title and summary prepared by the county counsel.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

9109.

Each petition section shall have attached to it an affidavit to be completed by the circulator. The affidavit shall be substantially in the same form as set forth in Section 104.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

9110.

Signatures shall be secured and the petition shall be presented to the county elections official for filing within 180 days from the date of receipt of the title and summary, or after termination of any action for a writ of mandate pursuant to Section 9106 and, if applicable, after receipt of an amended title or summary or both, whichever occurs later.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

9111.

(a) During the circulation of the petition or before taking either action described in subdivisions (a) and (b) of Section 9118, the board of supervisors may refer the proposed initiative measure to a county agency or agencies for a report on any or all of the following:

(1) Its fiscal impact.

(2) Its effect on the internal consistency of the county’s general and specific plans, including the housing element, the consistency between planning and zoning, and the limitations on county actions under Section 65008 of the Government Code and Chapters 4.2 (commencing with Section 65913) and 4.3 (commencing with Section 65915) of Division 1 of Title 7 of the Government Code.

(3) Its effect on the use of land, the impact on the availability and location of housing, and the ability of the county to meet its regional housing needs.

(4) Its impact on funding for infrastructure of all types, including, but not limited to, transportation, schools, parks, and open space. The report may also discuss whether the measure would be likely to result in increased infrastructure costs or savings, including the costs of infrastructure maintenance, to current residents and businesses.

(5) Its impact on the community’s ability to attract and retain business and employment.

(6) Its impact on the uses of vacant parcels of land.

(7) Its impact on agricultural lands, open space,
 traffic congestion, existing business districts, and developed areas designated for revitalization.

(8) Any other matters the board of supervisors requests to be in the report.

(b) The report shall be presented to the board of supervisors within the time prescribed by the board of supervisors, but no later than 30 days after the county elections official certifies to the board of supervisors the sufficiency of the petition.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 92, Sec. 62.   (SB 1289)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

9112.

On or before April 1 of each odd-numbered year, the county elections official of each county shall file a report with the Secretary of State containing the following information:

(a) The number of county initiative petitions circulated during the preceding two calendar years that did not qualify for the ballot, and the number of these proposed initiatives for which reports were prepared pursuant to Section 9111.

(b) With respect to county initiative measures that qualified for the ballot in the preceding two calendar years, the number that were approved by the voters, and the number of these ballot measures for which reports were prepared pursuant to Section 9111.

(c) With respect to county initiative measures that qualified for the ballot in the preceding two calendar years, the number which were not approved by the voters, and the number of these ballot measures for which reports were prepared pursuant to Section 9111.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

9113.

The petition shall be filed by the proponents, or by any person or persons authorized in writing by the proponents. All sections of the petition shall be filed at one time. Any sections of the petition not so filed shall be void for all purposes. Once filed, no petition section shall be amended except by order of a court of competent jurisdiction.

When the petition is filed, the county elections official shall determine the total number of signatures affixed to the petition. If, from this examination, the county elections official determines that the number of signatures, prima facie, equals or is in excess of the minimum number of signatures required, the county elections official shall examine the petition in accordance with Section 9114 or 9115. If, from this examination, the county elections official determines that the number of signatures, prima facie, does not equal or exceed the minimum number of signatures required, no further action shall be taken.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

9114.

Except as provided in Section 9115, within 30 days from the date of filing of the petition, excluding Saturdays, Sundays, and holidays, the elections official shall examine the petition, and from the records of registration ascertain whether or not the petition is signed by the requisite number of voters. A certificate showing the results of this examination shall be attached to the petition.

In determining the number of valid signatures, the elections official may check the signatures against facsimiles of voters’ signatures provided that the method of preparing and displaying the facsimiles complies with law. A signature shall not be invalidated because of a variation of the signature caused
 by the substitution of initials for the first or middle name, or both, of the person signing the petition.

The elections official shall notify the proponents of the petition as to the sufficiency or insufficiency of the petition.

If the petition is found insufficient, no further action shall be taken. However, the failure to secure sufficient signatures, shall not preclude the filing of a new petition on the same subject, at a later date.

If the petition is found sufficient, the elections official shall certify the results of the examination to the board of supervisors at the next regular meeting of the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 14, Sec. 3.   (AB 698)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

9115.

(a) Within 30 days from the date of filing of the petition, excluding Saturdays, Sundays, and holidays, if, from the examination of petitions pursuant to Section 9114 shows that more than 500 signatures have been signed on the petition, the elections official may use a random sampling technique for verification of signatures. The random sample of signatures to be verified shall be drawn so that every signature filed with the elections official shall be given an equal opportunity to be included in the sample. The random sampling shall include an examination of at least 500, or 3 percent of the signatures, whichever is greater. A signature shall not be invalidated because of a variation of the signature caused by the substitution of initials for
 the first or middle name, or both, of the person signing the petition.

(b) If the statistical sampling shows that the number of valid signatures is within 95 to 110 percent of the number of signatures of qualified voters needed to declare the petition sufficient, the elections official shall, within 90 days from the date of the filing of the petition, excluding Saturdays, Sundays, and holidays, examine and verify the signatures filed. If the elections official determines, prior to completing the examination of each signature filed, that the petition is signed by the requisite number of qualified voters to declare the petition sufficient, the elections official may terminate the verification of the remaining unverified signatures.

(c) In determining from the records of registration, what
 number of valid signatures are signed on the petition, the elections official may check the signatures against facsimiles of voters’ signatures, provided that the method of preparing and displaying the facsimiles complies with law.

(d) The elections official shall attach to the petition a certificate showing the result of this examination and shall notify the proponents of either the sufficiency or insufficiency of the petition.

(e) If the petition is found insufficient, no action shall be taken on the petition. However, the failure to secure sufficient signatures does not preclude the filing later of an entirely new petition to the same effect.

(f) If the petition is found to be sufficient, the elections official shall
 certify the results of the examination to the board of supervisors at the next regular meeting of the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 870, Sec. 2.   (SB 386)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

9118.

If the initiative petition is signed by voters not less in number than 10 percent of the entire vote cast in the county for all candidates for Governor at the last gubernatorial election preceding the publication of the notice of intention to circulate an initiative petition, the board of supervisors shall do one of the following:

(a) Adopt the ordinance, without alteration,
 at the regular meeting at which the certification of the petition is presented, or within 10 days after it is presented.

(b) Submit the ordinance, without alteration, to the voters pursuant to Section 1405.

(c) Order a report pursuant to Section 9111 at the regular meeting at which the certification of the petition is presented. When the report is presented to the board of supervisors, the board shall either adopt the ordinance within 10 days or order an election pursuant to subdivision (b).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 748, Sec. 4.   (AB 765)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

9118.5.

The proponent of an initiative may withdraw the initiative at any time before the 88th day before the election, whether or not the petition has already been found sufficient by the elections official.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 155, Sec. 1.   (SB 1153)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

9119.

Whenever any ordinance is required by this article to be submitted to the voters of a county at any election, the county elections official shall cause the ordinance to be printed. A copy of the ordinance shall be made available to any voter upon request.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

9120.

Article 3 (commencing with Section 9160) shall govern the procedures for submitting arguments for county initiatives.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

9121.

Any number of proposed ordinances may be voted upon at the same election.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

9122.

If a majority of the voters voting on a proposed ordinance vote in its favor, the ordinance shall become a valid and binding ordinance of the county. The ordinance shall be considered as adopted upon the date the vote is declared by the board of supervisors, and shall go into effect 10 days after that date.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

9123.

If the provisions of two or more ordinances adopted at the same election conflict, the ordinance receiving the highest number of affirmative votes shall control.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

9124.

The enacting clause of an ordinance submitted to the voters of a county shall be substantially in the following form:

“The people of the County of ____ ordain as follows:”

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

9125.

No ordinance proposed by initiative petition and adopted either by the board of supervisors without submission to the voters or adopted by the voters shall be repealed or amended except by a vote of the people, unless provision is otherwise made in the original ordinance. In all other respects, an ordinance proposed by initiative petition and adopted shall have the same force and effect as any ordinance adopted by the board of supervisors.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

9126.

This article does not apply to any statewide initiative measure.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Referendum [9140. - 9147.]

9140.

The board of supervisors may submit to the voters, without a petition, an ordinance for the repeal, amendment, or enactment of any ordinance. The ordinance shall be voted upon at any succeeding regular or special election and, if it receives a majority of the votes cast, the ordinance shall be repealed, amended, or enacted accordingly.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

9141.

(a) Except an ordinance granting a franchise, the following ordinances shall take effect immediately:

(1) Those calling or otherwise relating to an election.

(2) Those specifically required by law to take immediate effect.

(3) Those fixing the amount of money to be raised by taxation or the rate of taxes to be levied.

(4) Those for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety. The ordinances referred to in this subdivision shall contain a declaration of the facts constituting the necessity and shall be passed by a four-fifths vote of the board of supervisors.

(b) All other ordinances, including ordinances granting a franchise, shall become effective 30 days from and after the date of final passage.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

9142.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 9141, ordinances authorizing the issuance of revenue bonds by a county as part of a joint powers entity pursuant to Section 6547 of the Government Code shall not take effect for 60 days.

(b) When the number of votes cast for all candidates for Governor at the last gubernatorial election within the boundaries of the county described in subdivision (a) exceeds 500,000, the ordinance is subject to referendum upon presentation of a petition bearing
 signatures of at least 5 percent of the entire vote cast within the boundaries of the county for all candidates for Governor at the last gubernatorial election. When the number of votes cast for all candidates for Governor at the last gubernatorial election within the boundaries of the county is less than 500,000, the ordinance is subject to referendum upon presentation of a petition bearing signatures of at least 10 percent of the entire vote cast within the boundaries of the county for all candidates for Governor at the last gubernatorial election.

(c) For the purpose of submitting the question to the voters pursuant to subdivision (b), the ballot wording shall approximate the following: 

“Shall the (county
 name) ,as a member of the (joint powers entity name) ,
 authorize the issuance of revenue bonds by the joint powers entity in the amount of $____ pursuant to ordinance number ____, dated ____, the bonds to be used for the following purposes and to be redeemed in the following manner: ________?”

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

9143.

Notwithstanding Section 9141, that portion of any ordinance that changes supervisorial salaries shall become effective 60 days from the date of its final passage.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

9144.

If a petition protesting the adoption of an ordinance is submitted to the county elections official before the effective date of the ordinance, the ordinance shall be suspended and the board of supervisors shall reconsider the ordinance. The petition shall be signed by voters of the county equal in number to at least 10 percent of the entire vote cast within the county for all candidates for Governor at the last gubernatorial election.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 106, Sec. 3.   (AB 3370)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

9144.5.

The proponent of a referendum may withdraw the referendum at any time before the 88th day before the election, whether or not the petition has already been found sufficient by the elections official.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 569, Sec. 1.   (SB 681)   Effective October 8, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

9145.

If the board of supervisors does not entirely repeal the ordinance against which a petition is filed, the board shall submit the ordinance to the voters either at the next regularly scheduled county election occurring not less than 88 days after the date of the order, or at a special election called for that purpose not less than 88 days after the date of the order. The ordinance shall not become effective unless and until a majority of the voters voting on the ordinance vote in favor of it.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

9146.

The provisions of this code relating to the form of petitions, the duties of the county elections official, and the manner of holding elections, when an ordinance is proposed by initiative petition, govern the procedure on ordinances against which a protest is filed.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

9147.

(a) The heading of a proposed referendum measure shall be in substantially the following form: 
Referendum Against an Ordinance Passed by the Board of Supervisors.

(b) Each section of the referendum petition shall contain the title and text of the ordinance or the portion of the ordinance which is the subject of the referendum.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Arguments Concerning County Measures [9160. - 9170.]

9160.

(a) If a county measure qualifies for a place on the ballot, the county elections official shall transmit a copy of the measure to the county auditor and to the county counsel or to the district attorney in a county that does not have a county counsel.

(b) (1) The county counsel or district attorney shall prepare an impartial analysis of the measure showing the effect of the measure on the existing law and the operation of the measure. The analysis shall include a statement indicating whether the measure was placed on the ballot by a petition signed by the requisite number of voters or by the board of supervisors. The analysis shall be printed preceding the arguments for and against the measure. The analysis may not exceed 500 words in
 length.

(2) Additionally, the county counsel or district attorney may prepare a summary of the impartial analysis in a format that answers the questions “What does a yes vote mean?” and “What does a no vote mean?” for each measure, with the summary for each question limited to 75 words or less. If the county counsel or district attorney prepares a summary pursuant to this paragraph, it may be included in the county voter information guide.

(3) If
 the entire text of the measure is not printed on the ballot, nor in the county voter information guide, there shall be printed immediately below the impartial analysis, in no less than 10-point boldface type, a legend substantially as follows:

“The above statement is an impartial analysis of Ordinance or Measure ____. If you desire a copy of the ordinance or measure, please call the elections official’s office at (insert telephone number) and a copy will be mailed at no cost to you.”

(4) The elections official may, at his or her discretion, add the
 following message to the statement in paragraph (3): “You may also access the full text of the measure on the county Web site at the following Web site address (insert Web site address).”

(c) Not later than 88 days before an election that includes a county ballot measure, the board of supervisors may direct the county auditor to review the measure and determine if the substance
 of the county ballot measure, if adopted, would affect the revenues or expenditures of the county. He or she shall prepare a fiscal impact statement which estimates the amount of any increase or decrease in revenues or costs to the county if the proposed measure is adopted. The fiscal impact statement is “official matter” within the meaning of Section 13303, and shall be printed preceding the arguments for and against the measure. The fiscal impact statement may not exceed 500 words in length.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 422, Sec. 42.   (AB 2911)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

9161.

If there is no other method provided by law, arguments for and against any county measure may be submitted to the qualified voters of the county pursuant to this article. If a method is otherwise provided by law for submitting such arguments as to a particular kind of county measure, that method shall control.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

9162.

(a) The board of supervisors or any member or members of the board, or an individual voter who is eligible to vote on the measure, or bona fide association of citizens, or a combination of these voters and associations may file a written argument for or against any county measure. An argument shall not exceed 300 words in length. The county elections official shall cause an argument for and an argument against the measure, and the analysis of the measure, to be printed, and shall enclose a copy of both arguments preceded by the analysis with each county voter information guide. The printed arguments and the analysis are “official matter” within the meaning of Section 13303.

(b) The following statement shall be printed on the front cover, or if none, on the heading of the first page, of the printed arguments:

“Arguments in support of or in opposition to the proposed laws are the opinions of the authors.”

(c) Printed arguments submitted to voters in accordance with this section shall be titled either “Argument In Favor Of Measure ____” or “Argument Against Measure ____,” accordingly, the blank spaces being filled in only with the letter or number, if any, which designates the measure. At the discretion of the county elections official, the word “Proposition” may be substituted for the word “Measure” in the titles. Words used in the title shall not be counted when determining the length of an argument.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 422, Sec. 43.   (AB 2911)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

9163.

Based on the time reasonably necessary to prepare and print the arguments, analysis, and county voter information guides and to permit the 10-calendar-day public examination as provided in Article 5 (commencing with Section 9190) for the particular election, the county elections official shall fix and determine a reasonable date before the election after which no arguments for or against any county measure may
 be submitted for printing and distribution to the voters as provided in this article. Notice of the date fixed shall be published by the county elections official pursuant to Section 6061 of the Government Code. Arguments may be changed until and including the date fixed by the county elections official.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 422, Sec. 44.   (AB 2911)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

9164.

A ballot argument shall not be accepted under this article unless accompanied by the printed name and signature or printed names and signatures of the person or persons submitting it, or, if submitted on behalf of an organization, the name of the organization and the printed name and signature of at least one of its principal officers.

No more than five signatures shall appear with any argument submitted under this article. In case any argument is signed by more than five persons, the signatures of the first five shall be printed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1081, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

9166.

(a) If more than one argument for or more than one argument against any county measure is submitted to the county elections official within the time prescribed, the county elections official shall select one of the arguments in favor and one of the arguments against the measure for printing and distribution to the voters. In selecting the argument, the county elections official shall give preference and priority in the order named to the arguments of the following:

(1) The board of supervisors or a member or members of the board.

(2) The individual voter, or bona fide association of citizens, or combination of voters
 and associations, who are the bona fide sponsors or proponents of the measure.

(3) Bona fide associations of citizens.

(4) Individual voters who are eligible to vote on the measure.

(b) In order to enable the county elections official to determine whether it qualifies as a bona fide association of citizens, an organization or association submitting an argument for or against a county measure shall submit with its argument a copy of one of the following:

(1) Its articles of incorporation, articles of
 association, partnership documents, bylaws, or similar documents.

(2) Letterhead containing the name of the organization and its principal officers.

(3) If the organization or association is a primarily formed committee established to support or oppose the measure, its statement of organization filed pursuant to Section 84101 of the Government Code.

(c) In selecting an argument from among bona fide associations of citizens, the county elections official shall not consider the type of documentation submitted pursuant to subdivision (b) or the form of the association.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 75, Sec. 2.   (SB 665)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

9167.

(a) When an argument in favor and an argument against a measure have been selected for publication in the voter information pamphlet the official responsible for conducting the election shall send copies of the argument in favor of the measure to the authors of the argument against the measure and copies of the arguments against the measure to the authors of the argument in favor. The authors may prepare and submit rebuttal arguments not exceeding 250 words, or may authorize in writing any other person or persons to prepare, submit, or sign the rebuttal argument. The rebuttal arguments shall be submitted to the elections official conducting the election no later than a date designated by the elections official.

(b) Rebuttal arguments shall be printed in the same manner as the direct arguments. Each rebuttal argument shall immediately follow the direct argument that it seeks to rebut and shall be titled “Rebuttal to Argument in Favor of Measure (or Proposition) ____,” or “Rebuttal to Argument Against Measure (or Proposition) ____,” the blank spaces being filled in only with the letter or number, if any, designating the measure. Words used in the title may not be counted when determining the length of any rebuttal argument.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 228, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

9168.

(a) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, this article shall apply to any district bond election called by, and the returns of which are canvassed by, the board of supervisors, or to any district bond election conducted by a district. This article shall also apply to any special election, if the board of supervisors so provides in its proclamation or notice thereof.

(b) At any election subject to this section:

(1) “County measure” shall be deemed to refer to any measure as defined in Section 329. Section 312 shall not apply.

(2) Section 9160, and the reference to the analysis of the measure in Section 9162, shall not apply unless the board of supervisors directs the officer to prepare the analysis.

(c) This article shall not apply to any school district bond election.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

9170.

(a) Subject to subdivision (d), the ballot label or similar description of a county, city, district, or school measure on a county ballot shall end with all of the following:

(1) After the text “Supporters:”, a listing of associations, nonprofit organizations, businesses, or individuals taken from the signers or the text of the argument in favor of the measure printed in the voter information guide. The list of supporters shall not exceed 125 characters in length. Each supporter shall be separated by a semicolon. An association, nonprofit organization, business, or individual shall not be listed unless they support the measure.

(2) After the text “Opponents:”, a listing of associations, nonprofit organizations, businesses, or individuals taken from the signers or the text of the argument against the measure printed in the voter information guide. The list of opponents shall not exceed 125 characters in length. Each opponent shall be separated by a semicolon. An association, nonprofit organization, business, or individual shall not be listed unless they oppose the measure.

(3) A supporter or opponent shall not be listed pursuant to paragraph (1) or (2) unless it is one of the following:

(A) An association, nonprofit organization, or business that was not originally created as a committee described in Section 82013 of the Government Code and that has been in existence for at least four years.

(B) A current or former elected official, who may be listed with the official’s title (e.g., “State Senator Mary Smith,” “Assembly Member Carlos Garcia,” or “former Eureka City Council Member Amy Lee”). These titles may be shortened (e.g. “Senator” or “Sen.” for “State Senator” or “Asm.” for “Assembly Member”).

(C) An individual who is not a current or former elected official may be listed only with the individual’s first and last name and an honorific (e.g., “Dr.,” “M.D.,” “Ph.D.,” or “Esquire”), with no other title or designation, unless it is a title representing an association, nonprofit organization, or business that meets the requirements of subparagraph (A) or (B) and that is eligible to be listed under paragraph (1) if the individual supports the measure or under paragraph
 (2) if the individual opposes the measure.

(4) Spaces, commas, semicolons, and other characters count towards the 125-character limit in paragraphs (1) and (2).

(5) A supporter or opponent shall not be listed pursuant to paragraph (1) or (2) if the supporter or opponent is a political party or is representing a political party.

(6) The name of an association, nonprofit organization, or business included in the list of supporters and opponents as required by this section may be shortened by the proponents or opponents who submit it using acronyms, abbreviations, or by leaving out words in their name, as long as doing so would not confuse voters with another well-known organization or business that did not take the same
 position on the ballot measure (e.g., “Hot Air Balloon Flyers of Montana Education Fund” may be shortened to “Hot Air Balloons Montana”).

(7) Supporters and opponents listed pursuant to paragraph (1) or (2) shall be added as text after the condensed ballot title and summary, if any, and may be separated by semicolons. Supporters and opponents need not be displayed on separate horizontal lines on the ballot. If no list of supporters is provided by the proponents or there are none that meet the requirements of this section, then “Supporters:” shall be followed by “None submitted.” If no list of opponents is provided by the opponents or there are none that meet the requirements of this section, then “Opponents:” shall be followed by “None submitted.”

(8) If the ballot emphasizes
 the text “Supporters:” or “Opponents:” by use of boldface font, underlining, or any other method that differentiates that text from the list of supporters or opponents that follow, the text “Supporters:” or “Opponents:” may be displayed with only the initial letter capitalized. If that text is not emphasized, then each letter of that text shall be capitalized.
